Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1472
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; breath test; refusal; penalty.

Any law enforcement officer who has been duly authorized to make arrests for violation of traffic laws of this state or ordinances of any city or village may require any person who operates or has in his actual physical control an aircraft within the airspace of this state to submit to a preliminary test of his breath for alcohol content if the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that such person has alcohol in his body, or has committed a violation of flying regulations, or has been involved in an aircraft accident. Any person who refuses to submit to such preliminary breath test or whose preliminary breath test results indicate an alcohol content of five-hundredths of one percent or more shall be placed under arrest. Any person who refuses to submit to such preliminary breath test shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 8.